District of Columbia statutes.
44-713

Compensation of physicians to the poor.

The compensation of the physicians to the poor shall not exceed $40 per month each.

Feb. 25, 1885, 23 Stat. 314, ch. 145, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 32-1205.
1973 Ed., § 32-1005.

Prior Codifications